Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5679.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Employee" means an individual who is employed by an employer. (b) "Employer" means a person that employs 1 or more employees. (c) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. Sec. 3. If an employer is required to ensure that the employer's employees complete the fall prevention training program established and administered under section 21795a of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.21795a, the employer shall pay wages to each employee, at the employee's normal hourly wage rate, for the time the employee participates in the fall prevention training program. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S03131'25) or House Bill No. 5678 (request no. H03131'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.